Hawaii statutes.
[§302A-1113] Seal. The department
shall adopt a seal, the impression of which shall be necessary to authenticate
all of its appointments, commissions, final acts of the nature of record, and
all other documents issued by it. Upon authorization by the superintendent, a
facsimile impression of the seal may be used to authenticate these documents.
[L 1996, c 89, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next